Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1910
Voice analysis examiner, defined.

Voice analysis examiner shall mean any person, other than an intern, who uses an instrument capable of permanently recording on a graph one or more psychophysiological reactions present in the voice of an examinee for the purpose of attempting to determine truth or deception.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 10.